en: Fresh quinces
fr: Coings frais

en: Tropical fruits, exotic fruits
bg: Тропически плодове
ca: Fruita tropical, Fruites exòtiques
da: Tropiske frugter, eksotiske frugter
de: Tropische Früchte, exotische Früchte
es: Frutas tropicales
fi: trooppiset hedelmät
fr: Fruits tropicaux, fruits exotiques
hr: Tropsko voće
it: Frutti esotici, Frutti tropicali, Frutta esotica, Frutta tropicale
lt: Tropiniai vaisiai, Egzotiniai vaisiai
nl: Tropisch fruit
pt: Frutas tropicais
ru: Тропические фрукты
sv: Tropiska frukter

en: Avocados
an: Aguacate
ar: افوكادو
az: Avokado
bg: Авокадо
bn: আভোকাদো
br: Avoukez
ca: Alvocat
cs: Avokádo
da: Avokadoer, Avocadoer
de: Avocados
el: Αβοκάντο
eo: Avokadoj
es: Aguacates
et: Avokaado
eu: Ahuakate
fi: Avokaadot
fr: Avocats
ga: Abhacád
gl: Aguacate
hi: एवोकाडो
hr: Avokado
ht: Zaboka
hu: Avokádó
hy: Ավոկադո
ia: Avocato
id: Alpukat
ig: Ube oyibo
it: Avocado
ja: アボカド
ka: Ავოკადო
kw: Avokado
lb: Avocado
ln: Sabúká
lt: Avokadai, Avokadas
mi: Rahopūru
mk: Авокадо
ml: അവോക്കാഡോ
ms: Avokado
nb: Avokadoer
ne: घ्यूँफल
nl: Avocados
nn: Avokadoar
pl: Awokado
pt: Abacate
qu: Palta
ro: Avocado
ru: Авокадо
sk: Avokádo
sl: Avokado
sq: Avokado
sv: Avokador, Avokados, Avocador, Avocados
te: అవోకాడో
tr: Avokado
uk: Авокадо
yi: אַװאָקאַדאָ
zh: 鳄梨

en: Avocado pulp
fr: Pulpe d'avocat

en: Hass avocados
xx: Hass avocados
da: Hass-avokadoer
de: Hass-Avocados
es: Aguacates Hass
fa: آووکادوی هاس
fr: Avocats Hass
hr: Hass avokado
it: Avocado hass
ja: ハスアボカド
ko: 할아버지 아보카도
la: Persea americana ‘Hass’
nl: Hass-avocados
pt: Abacates hass
ru: Авокадо Хасс
sl: Avokado Hass
sv: Hass-avokador
uk: Авокадо Хасс
zh: 哈斯酪梨, 哈斯牛油果

en: Ready-to-eat avocados
da: Spiseklare avokadoer
nl: Eetrijpe avocados
sv: Ätmogna avokador

en: Ready-to-eat Hass avocados
da: Spiseklare hass-avokadoer
nl: Eetrijpe hass-avocados
sv: Ätmogna hass-avokador

en: Bananas
bg: Банани
de: Bananen
es: Plátanos, Bananas
fi: banaanit
fr: Bananes
he: בננות
hr: Banane
it: Banane
ja: バナナ, ばなな
lt: Bananai
nl: Bananen
pt: Bananas
ru: Бананы
tr: Muz

en: Fresh bananas, Bananas (fresh)
de: Frische Bananen
fr: Bananes fraîches
nl: verse bananen

en: Frozen bananas, Bananas (frozen)
fr: Bananes congélés
nl: Bananen(diepvries)

en: Plantain bananas
de: Kochbananen
fr: Bananes plantains, banane plantain, banane farine, bananes farines
hr: Trputac banane
ja: プランテン
lt: Gysločio bananai
nl: Bakbananen, Kookbananen

en: Cavendish Bananas, Bananas Cavendish
xx: Cavendish
fr: Bananes Cavendish
nl: Cavendish Bananen

en: Bananas from the Canary Islands
es: Plátano de Canarias
fr: Bananes des Îles Canaries
nl: Bananen van de Canarische eilanden

en: Frecinette Bananas, Frécinette bananas, Frécinettes bananas, Bananas (frécinette)
fr: Bananes frécinettes, Bananes fréchinettes

en: Matooke bananas, Bananas (Matooke)
xx: Matooke
fr: Bananes matooke, Matooke, matoke

en: Red bananas, Bananas(red)
ar: الموز الأحمر
fr: Bananes rouges
hr: Crvena banana
id: Pisang susu merah
lt: Raudonieji bananai
ml: ചെങ്കദളി
nl: Rode bananen
pt: Banana vermelha
ta: செவ்வாழை

en: Cooked plantain bananas
fr: Bananes plantain cuites

en: Banana flours
fr: Farines de banane
hr: Brašna od banane
lt: Bananų miltai
nl: Bananenmelen

en: Fresh Cavendish Bananas, Bananas (fresh Cavendish)
fr: Bananes fraîches Cavendish, Bananes Cavendish fraîches
nl: Verse hele Cavendish bananen, Bananen(verse Cavendish)

en: Fresh Frecinette Bananas, Bananas (fresh frecinette)
fr: Bananes frecinettes fraîches
nl: Verse hele frecinette bananen